local/apertium-tr-az/apertium-tr-az.az.dix.xml
      <pardef n="ver/mək__vblex">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ərəm</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ərəmmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mərəm</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mərəmmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ərsən</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ərsənmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>məzsən</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>məzsənmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ər</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ərmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>məz</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>məzmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ərik</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ərikmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mərik</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mərikmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ərsiniz</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ərsinizmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>məzsiniz</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>məzsinizmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ərler</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ərlermi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>məzlər</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>məzlərmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </pardef>

    <e lm="vermək"><i>ver</i><par n="ver/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gəlmək"><i>gəl</i><par n="ver/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bilmək"><i>bil</i><par n="ver/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="çəkinmək"><i>çəkin</i><par n="ver/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="təmas etmək"><i>təmas<b/>et</i><par n="ver/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="devirmək"><i>devir</i><par n="ver/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="təngə gəlmək"><i>təngə<b/>gəl</i><par n="ver/mək__vblex"/></e>
